trunk/apertium-en-ca/apertium-en-ca.en.metadix
    <pardef n="probj_dem__prn">
      <e>
        <i/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>me</l>
          <r><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>you</l>
          <r><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>him</l>
          <r><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>her</l>
          <r><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>it</l>
          <r><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>us</l>
          <r><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>them</l>
          <r><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>this</l>
          <r><j/>this<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>these</l>
          <r><j/>this<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>that</l>
          <r><j/>that<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>those</l>
          <r><j/>that<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="ouml">
      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ö</l>
	  <r>ö</r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
	<p>
	  <l>oe</l>
	  <r>ö</r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="uuml">
      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ü</l>
	  <r>ü</r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
	<p>
	  <l>ue</l>
	  <r>ü</r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

 
   <!-- dialects -->
    <pardef n="o_ou">
      <e v="en_GB">
	<p>
	  <l>ou</l>
	  <r>ou</r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e v="en_US">
	<p>
	  <l>o</l>
	  <r>ou</r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="z_s">
      <e v="en_US">
        <p>
          <l>z</l>
          <r>s</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e v="en_GB">
        <i>s</i>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="e_ae">
      <e v="en_US">
	<p>
	  <l>e</l>
	  <r>ae</r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e v="en_GB">
	<p>
	  <l>ae</l>
	  <r>ae</r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="l_ll">
      <e v="en_US">
	<p>
	  <l>l</l>
	  <r>ll</r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e v="en_GB">
	<p>
	  <l>ll</l>
	  <r>ll</r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="e_oe">
      <e v="en_US">
	<p>
	  <l>e</l>
	  <r>oe</r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e v="en_GB">
	<p>
	  <l>oe</l>
	  <r>oe</r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="organi/ze__vblex">
      <e v="en_GB">
	<p>
	  <l>s</l>
	  <r>s</r>
	</p>
	<par n="liv/e__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e v="en_US">
	<p>
	  <l>z</l>
	  <r>s</r>
	</p>
      <par n="liv/e__vblex"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>


  </pardefs>

    <e>      <i>D</i><par n="ouml"/><i>rler</i><par n="Smith__np"/>    </e>
    <e lm="anaemic"><i>an</i><par n="e_ae"/><i>mic</i><par n="house__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="anaemia"><i>an</i><par n="e_ae"/><i>mia</i><par n="house__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="anaesthesia"><i>an</i><par n="e_ae"/><i>sthesia</i><par n="house__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="chimaera"><i>chim</i><par n="e_ae"/><i>ra</i><par n="house__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="diarrhea"><i>diarrh</i><par n="e_oe"/><i>a</i><par n="house__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="favouritism"><i>fav</i><par n="o_ou"/><i>ritism</i><par n="house__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="feces"><i>f</i><par n="e_ae"/><i>ces</i><par n="alms__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="foetus"><i>f</i><par n="e_oe"/><i>tus</i><par n="access__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="apnoea"><i>apn</i><par n="e_oe"/><i>a</i><par n="house__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="honour"><i>hon</i><par n="o_ou"/><i>r</i><par n="house__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="colourless"><i>col</i><par n="o_ou"/><i>rless</i><par n="expensive__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="leukaemia"><i>leuk</i><par n="e_ae"/><i>mia</i><par n="house__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="organiser"><i>organi</i><par n="z_s"/><i>er</i><par n="house__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="palaeontologist"><i>pal</i><par n="e_ae"/><i>ontologist</i><par n="house__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="traveller"><i>trave</i><par n="l_ll"/><i>er</i><par n="house__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="organisational"><i>organi</i><par n="z_s"/><i>ational</i><par n="expensive__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="favourable"><i>fav</i><par n="o_ou"/><i>rable</i><par n="expensive__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="favourite"><i>fav</i><par n="o_ou"/><i>rite</i><par n="expensive__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="favourite"><i>fav</i><par n="o_ou"/><i>rite</i><par n="house__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="anaesthetise"><i>an</i><par n="e_ae"/><i>stheti</i><par n="organi/ze__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="acclimatise"><i>acclimati</i><par n="organi/ze__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="throw off balance"><i>thr</i><par n="bl/ow__vblex" sa="sep"/>      <par n="probj_dem__prn"/>      <p>        <l><b/>off<b/>balance</l><r><g><b/>off<b/>balance</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="knock down"><i>knock</i><par n="accept__vblex" sa="sep"/>      <par n="probj_dem__prn"/>      <p>        <l><b/>down</l><r><g><b/>down</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="pull down"><i>pull</i><par n="accept__vblex" sa="sep"/>      <par n="probj_dem__prn"/>      <p>        <l><b/>down</l><r><g><b/>down</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="carry out"><i>carr</i><par n="appl/y__vblex" sa="sep"/>      <par n="probj_dem__prn"/>      <p>        <l><b/>out</l><r><g><b/>out</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="check out"><i>check</i><par n="accept__vblex" sa="sep"/>      <par n="probj_dem__prn"/>      <p>        <l><b/>out</l><r><g><b/>out</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="commercialize"><i>commerciali</i><par n="organi/ze__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="favour"><i>fav</i><par n="o_ou"/><i>r</i><par n="house__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="harmonize"><i>harmoni</i><par n="organi/ze__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="line up"><i>lin</i><par n="liv/e__vblex" sa="sep"/>      <par n="probj_dem__prn"/>      <p>        <l><b/>up</l><r><g><b/>up</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="monopolize"><i>monopoli</i><par n="organi/ze__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="organize"><i>organi</i><par n="organi/ze__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="note down"><i>not</i><par n="liv/e__vblex" sa="sep"/>      <par n="probj_dem__prn"/>      <p>        <l><b/>down</l><r><g><b/>down</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="revolutionize"><i>revolutioni</i><par n="organi/ze__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="slow down"><i>slow</i><par n="accept__vblex" sa="sep"/>      <par n="probj_dem__prn"/>      <p>        <l><b/>down</l><r><g><b/>down</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="trace back"><i>trac</i><par n="liv/e__vblex" sa="sep"/>      <par n="probj_dem__prn"/>      <p>        <l><b/>back</l><r><g><b/>back</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="turn off"><i>turn</i><par n="accept__vblex" sa="sep"/>      <par n="probj_dem__prn"/>      <p>        <l><b/>off</l><r><g><b/>off</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="in favour of"><i>in<b/>fav</i><par n="o_ou"/><i>r<b/>of</i><par n="at__pr"/>    </e>
    <e lm="Jürgen Trumpf"><i>J</i><par n="uuml"/><i>rgen<b/>Trumpf</i><par n="Mark__np"/>     </e>
    <e lm="Jürgen"><i>J</i><par n="uuml"/><i>rgen</i><par n="Mark__np"/>     </e>
    <e lm="Tönis"><i>T</i><par n="ouml"/><i>nis</i><par n="Mark__np"/>     </e>
    <e lm="Pöttering"><i>P</i><par n="ouml"/><i>ttering</i><par n="Smith__np"/>     </e>
    <e lm="fill up" a="prompsit2cdl"><i>fill</i><par n="accept__vblex" sa="sep"/><par n="probj_dem__prn"/><p><l><b/>up</l><r><g><b/>up</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="aluminize"><i>alumini</i><par n="organi/ze__vblex" /></e>
    <e lm="anesthesiology"><i>an</i><par n="e_ae"/><i>sthesiolog</i><par n="bab/y__n"/>     </e>
    <e lm="behavioural"><i>behavi</i><par n="o_ou"/><i>ral</i><par n="expensive__adj"/>     </e>
    <e lm="encyclopedic"><i>encyclop</i><par n="e_ae"/><i>dic</i><par n="expensive__adj"/>     </e>
    <e lm="polarizer"><i>polari</i><par n="z_s"/><i>er</i><par n="house__n"/>     </e>
    <e lm="tricolor"><i>tricol</i><par n="o_ou"/><i>r</i><par n="expensive__adj"/>     </e>
<e lm="get across"><i>g</i><par n="g/et__vblex" sa="sep"/><par n="probj_dem__prn"/><p><l><b/>across</l><r><g><b/>across</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="equalise"><i>equali</i><par n="organi/ze__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="crystallise"><i>crysta</i><par n="l_ll"/><i>i</i><par n="organi/ze__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="encyclopaedia"><i>encyclop</i><par n="e_ae"/><i>dia</i><par n="house__n"/></e>
    <e lm="labourer" a="greenbreen"><i>lab</i><par n="o_ou"/><i>rer</i><par n="house__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tranquilizer" a="greenbreen"><i>tranquili</i><par n="z_s"/><i>er</i><par n="house__n"/></e>
    <e lm="anesthetic" a="greenbreen"><i>an</i><par n="e_ae"/><i>sthetic</i><par n="house__n"/></e>
    <e lm="enamoured" a="greenbreen"><i>enam</i><par n="o_ou"/><i>red</i><par n="expensive__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="iodized" a="greenbreen"><i>iodi</i><par n="z_s"/><i>ed</i><par n="expensive__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="World Health Organisation" a="greenbreen"><i>World<b/>Health<b/>Organi</i><par n="z_s"/><i>ation</i><par n="Linux__np"/></e>
    <e lm="compartmentalized" a="greenbreen"><i>compartmentali</i><par n="z_s"/><i>ed</i><par n="expensive__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="subcompartmentalized" a="greenbreen"><i>subcompartmentali</i><par n="z_s"/><i>ed</i><par n="expensive__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="analyzable" a="greenbreen"><i>analy</i><par n="z_s"/><i>able</i><par n="expensive__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="modelling" a="greenbreen"><i>mode</i><par n="l_ll"/><i>ing</i><par n="house__n"/></e>
    <e lm="motorised" a="greenbreen"><i>motori</i><par n="z_s"/><i>ed</i><par n="expensive__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="wall in"><i>wall</i><par n="accept__vblex" sa="sep"/>      <par n="probj_dem__prn"/>      <p>        <l><b/>in</l><r><g><b/>in</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="philosophize"><i>philosophi</i><par n="organi/ze__vblex"/>    </e>
<e lm="metallize"><i>meta</i><par n="l_ll"/><i>i</i><par n="organi/ze__vblex"/>    </e>
<e lm="conceptualize"><i>conceptuali</i><par n="organi/ze__vblex"/>    </e>
<e lm="schematize"><i>schemati</i><par n="organi/ze__vblex"/>    </e>
<e lm="anesthesiology"><i>an</i><par n="e_ae"/><i>sthesiolog</i><par n="bab/y__n"/></e>
<e lm="behaviourism"><i>behavi</i><par n="o_ou"/><i>rism</i><par n="house__n"/></e>
<e lm="neobehaviourism"><i>neobehavi</i><par n="o_ou"/><i>rism</i><par n="house__n"/></e>
<e lm="polarizability"><i>polari</i><par n="z_s"/><i>abilit</i><par n="bab/y__n"/></e>
    <e lm="demineralise"><i>deminerali</i><par n="organi/ze__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="satirise"><i>satiri</i><par n="organi/ze__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="individualised"><i>individuali</i><par n="z_s"/><i>ed</i><par n="expensive__adj"/></e>
     <e lm="authorization for therapeutic use" a="eleka"><i>authori</i><par n="z_s"/><i>ation</i><par n="house__n"/><p><l><b/>for<b/>therapeutic<b/>use</l><r><g><b/>for<b/>therapeutic<b/>use</g></r></p></e>
